Washington statutes.
RCW 19.112.150

Biofuels advisory committee.

The director shall establish a biofuels advisory committee to advise the director on implementing or suspending the minimum renewable fuel content requirements. The committee shall advise the director on applicability to all users; logistical, technical, and economic issues of implementation, including the potential for credit trading, compliance and enforcement provisions, and tracking and reporting requirements; and how the use of renewable fuel blends greater than two percent and renewable fuels other than biodiesel or ethanol could achieve the goals of chapter 338, Laws of 2006. In addition, the committee shall make recommendations to the legislature and governor on the potential to use alternatives to biodiesel, which are produced from nonpetroleum renewable sources (inclusive of vegetable oils and animal fats), to meet the minimum renewable fuel content requirement. The director shall make recommendations to the legislature and the governor on the implementation or suspension of chapter 338, Laws of 2006 by September 1, 2007.

[ 2006 c 338 s 9.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2006 c 338: See note following RCW 19.112.110.